el: Κατηγορία εμπορικού οχήματος: 000 lb GVWR; 001+ lb GVWR; 001–10; 001–14; 001–16; 001–19; 001–33; 500 lb GVWR; 501–26; Κατηγορία 1: 0–6; Κατηγορία 2: 6; Κατηγορία 3: 10; Κατηγορία 4: 14; Κατηγορία 5: 16; Κατηγορία 6: 19; Κατηγορία 7: 26; Κατηγορία 8: 33; Άλλο
ro-RO: Clasa vehiculului comercial: 000 lb GVWR; 001+ lb GVWR; 001–10; 001–14; 001–16; 001–19; 001–33; 500 lb GVWR; 501–26; Clasa 1: 0–6; Clasa 2: 6; Clasa 3: 10; Clasa 4: 14; Clasa 5: 16; Clasa 6: 19; Clasa 7: 26; Clasa 8: 33; Altele
tr: Ticari araç sınıfı: 000 lb GVWR; 001+ lb GVWR; 001-10; 001-14; 001-16; 001-19; 001-33; 500 lb GVWR; 501-26; Sınıf 1: 0-6; Sınıf 2: 6; Sınıf 3: 10; Sınıf 4: 14; Sınıf 5: 16; Sınıf 6: 19; Sınıf 7: 26; Sınıf 8: 33; Diğer
hu: Haszonjármű osztálya: 000 lb GVWR; 001+ lb GVWR; 001–10; 001–14; 001–16; 001–19; 001–33; 500 lb GVWR; 501–26; 1. osztály: 0–6; 2. osztály: 6; 3. osztály: 10; 4. osztály: 14; 5. osztály: 16; 6. osztály: 19; 7. osztály: 26; 8. osztály: 33; Egyéb
fr: Catégorie de véhicules utilitaires: 000 lb PNBV; 001+ lb PNBV; 001–10; 001–14; 001–16; 001–19; 001–33; 500 lb PNBV; 501–26; Catégorie 1 : 0–6; Catégorie 2 : 6; Catégorie 3 : 10; Catégorie 4 : 14; Catégorie 5 : 16; Catégorie 6 : 19; Catégorie 7 : 26; Catégorie 8 : 33; Autre
sv: Kommersiell fordonsklass: 000 lb GVWR; 001+ lb GVWR; 001–10; 001–14; 001–16; 001–19; 001–33; 500 lb GVWR; 501–26; Klass 1: 0–6; Klass 2: 6; Klass 3: 10; Klass 4: 14; Klass 5: 16; Klass 6: 19; Klass 7: 26; Klass 8: 33; Övrigt
bg-BG: Клас на търговско превозно средство: 000 lb GVWR; 001+ lb GVWR; 001 – 10; 001 – 14; 001 – 16; 001 – 19; 001 – 33; 500 lb GVWR; 501 – 26; Клас 1: 0 – 6; Клас 2: 6; Клас 3: 10; Клас 4: 14; Клас 5: 16; Клас 6: 19; Клас 7: 26; Клас 8: 33; Друго
vi: Phân hạng xe thương mại: 000 lb GVWR; 001+ lb GVWR; 001–10; 001–14; 001–16; 001–19; 001–33; 500 lb GVWR; 501–26; Hạng 1: 0–6; Hạng 2: 6; Hạng 3: 10; Hạng 4: 14; Hạng 5: 16; Hạng 6: 19; Hạng 7: 26; Hạng 8: 33; Khác
pl: Klasa pojazdu użytkowego: 000 lb DMC; 001+ lb DMC; 001–10; 001–14; 001–16; 001–19; 001–33; 500 lb DMC; 501–26; Klasa 1: 0–6; Klasa 2: 6; Klasa 3: 10; Klasa 4: 14; Klasa 5: 16; Klasa 6: 19; Klasa 7: 26; Klasa 8: 33; Inna
ru: Класс коммерческого транспортного средства: Полная масса 000 фунтов; Полная масса от 001 фунта; 001–10; 001–14; 001–16; 001–19; 001–33; Полная масса 500 фунтов; 501–26; Класс 1: 0–6; Класс 2: 6; Класс 3: 10; Класс 4: 14; Класс 5: 16; Класс 6: 19; Класс 7: 26; Класс 8: 33; Другое
th: ประเภทรถยนต์เพื่อการพาณิชย์: GVWR 000 ปอนด์; GVWR 001+ ปอนด์; 001–10; 001–14; 001–16; 001–19; 001–33; GVWR 500 ปอนด์; 501–26; คลาส 1: 0–6; คลาส 2: 6; คลาส 3: 10; คลาส 4: 14; คลาส 5: 16; คลาส 6: 19; คลาส 7: 26; คลาส 8: 33; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta gospodarskega vozila: 000 lb GVWR; 001+ lb GVWR; 001–10; 001–14; 001–16; 001–19; 001–33; 500 lb GVWR; 501–26; Razred 1: 0–6; Razred 2: 6; Razred 3: 10; Razred 4: 14; Razred 5: 16; Razred 6: 19; Razred 7: 26; Razred 8: 33; Drugo
da: Erhvervskøretøjsklasse: 000 lb GVWR; 001+ lb GVWR; 001-10; 001-14; 001-16; 001-19; 001-33; 500 lb GVWR; 501-26; Klasse 1: 0-6; Klasse 2: 6; Klasse 3: 10; Klasse 4: 14; Klasse 5: 16; Klasse 6: 19; Klasse 7: 26; Klasse 8: 33; Andet
nb: Kommersiell kjøretøyklasse: 000 lb GVWR; 001+ lb GVWR; 001–10; 001–14; 001–16; 001–19; 001–33; 500 lb GVWR; 501–26; Klasse 1: 0–6; Klasse 2: 6; Klasse 3: 10; Klasse 4: 14; Klasse 5: 16; Klasse 6: 19; Klasse 7: 26; Klasse 8: 33; Annet
de: Nutzfahrzeugklasse: 000 lb GVWR; 001+ lb GVWR; 001–10; 001–14; 001–16; 001–19; 001–33; 500 lb GVWR; 501–26; Klasse 1: 0–6; Klasse 2: 6; Klasse 3: 10; Klasse 4: 14; Klasse 5: 16; Klasse 6: 19; Klasse 7: 26; Klasse 8: 33; Sonstige
ko: 상업용 차량 등급: 000lb GVWR; 001+lb GVWR; 001~10; 001~14; 001~16; 001~19; 001~33; 500lb GVWR; 501~26; 클래스 1: 0~6; 클래스 2: 6; 클래스 3: 10; 클래스 4: 14; 클래스 5: 16; 클래스 6: 19; 클래스 7: 26; 클래스 8: 33; 기타
sk-SK: Trieda úžitkového vozidla: 000 lb GVWR; 001+ lb GVWR; 001–10; 001–14; 001–16; 001–19; 001–33; 500 lb GVWR; 501–26; Trieda 1: 0–6; Trieda 2: 6; Trieda 3: 10; Trieda 4: 14; Trieda 5: 16; Trieda 6: 19; Trieda 7: 26; Trieda 8: 33; Iné
it: Classe del veicolo commerciale: 000 lb GVWR; 001+ lb GVWR; 001–10; 001–14; 001–16; 001–19; 001–33; 500 lb GVWR; 501–26; Classe 1: 0-6; Classe 2: 6; Classe 3: 10; Classe 4: 14; Classe 5: 16; Classe 6: 19; Classe 7: 26; Classe 8: 33; Altro
fi: Hyötyajoneuvon luokitus: 000 lb GVWR; 001+ lb GVWR; 001–10; 001–14; 001–16; 001–19; 001–33; 500 lb GVWR; 501–26; Luokka 1: 0–6; Luokka 2: 6; Luokka 3: 10; Luokka 4: 14; Luokka 5: 16; Luokka 6: 19; Luokka 7: 26; Luokka 8: 33; Muu
es: Clase de vehículo comercial: 000 lb GVWR; 001+ lb GVWR; 001–10; 001–14; 001–16; 001–19; 001–33; 500 lb GVWR; 501–26; Clase 1: 0–6; Clase 2: 6; Clase 3: 10; Clase 4: 14; Clase 5: 16; Clase 6: 19; Clase 7: 26; Clase 8: 33; Otro
hr-HR: Klasa gospodarskog vozila: 000 lb GVWR; 001+ lb GVWR; 001 – 10; 001 – 14; 001 – 16; 001 – 19; 001 – 33; 500 lb GVWR; 501 – 26; Klasa 1: 0 – 6; Klasa 2: 6; Klasa 3: 10; Klasa 4: 14; Klasa 5: 16; Klasa 6: 19; Klasa 7: 26; Klasa 8: 33; Ostalo
en: Commercial vehicle class: 000 lb GVWR; 001+ lb GVWR; 001–10; 001–14; 001–16; 001–19; 001–33; 500 lb GVWR; 501–26; Class 1: 0–6; Class 2: 6; Class 3: 10; Class 4: 14; Class 5: 16; Class 6: 19; Class 7: 26; Class 8: 33; Other
zh-TW: 商用車等級: 000 磅 GVWR; 001+ 磅 GVWR; 001–10; 001–14; 001–16; 001–19; 001–33; 500 磅 GVWR; 501–26; 第 1 級：0–6; 第 2 級：6; 第 3 級：10; 第 4 級：14; 第 5 級：16; 第 6 級：19; 第 7 級：26; 第 8 級：33; 其他
cs: Třída užitkových vozidel: 000 lb GVWR; 001+ lb GVWR; 001–10; 001–14; 001–16; 001–19; 001–33; 500 lb GVWR; 501–26; Třída 1: 0–6; Třída 2: 6; Třída 3: 10; Třída 4: 14; Třída 5: 16; Třída 6: 19; Třída 7: 26; Třída 8: 33; Ostatní
nl: Bedrijfsvoertuigklasse: 000 lb GVWR; 001+ lb GVWR; 001–10; 001–14; 001–16; 001–19; 001–33; 500 lb GVWR; 501–26; Klasse 1: 0–6; Klasse 2: 6; Klasse 3: 10; Klasse 4: 14; Klasse 5: 16; Klasse 6: 19; Klasse 7: 26; Klasse 8: 33; Overige
ja: 商用車クラス: 000ポンドGVWR; 001ポンド以上GVWR; 001〜10; 001〜14; 001〜16; 001〜19; 001〜33; 500ポンドGVWR; 501〜26; クラス1: 0〜6; クラス2: 6; クラス3: 10; クラス4: 14; クラス5: 16; クラス6: 19; クラス7: 26; クラス8: 33; その他
pt-PT: Classe de veículo comercial: 000 lb GVWR; 001+ lb GVWR; 001–10; 001–14; 001–16; 001–19; 001–33; 500 lb GVWR; 501–26; Classe 1: 0–6; Classe 2: 6; Classe 3: 10; Classe 4: 14; Classe 5: 16; Classe 6: 19; Classe 7: 26; Classe 8: 33; Outro
pt-BR: Classe de veículo comercial: 000 lb GVWR; 001+ lb GVWR; 001–10; 001–14; 001–16; 001–19; 001–33; 500 lb GVWR; 501–26; Classe 1: 0–6; Classe 2: 6; Classe 3: 10; Classe 4: 14; Classe 5: 16; Classe 6: 19; Classe 7: 26; Classe 8: 33; Outro
zh-CN: 商用车等级: 000 磅 GVWR; 001+ 磅 GVWR; 001–10; 001–14; 001–16; 001–19; 001–33; 500 磅 GVWR; 501–26; 第 1 类：0–6; 第 2 类：6; 第 3 类：10; 第 4 类：14; 第 5 类：16; 第 6 类：19; 第 7 类：26; 第 8 类：33; 其他
lt-LT: Komercinės transporto priemonės klasė: 000 svar. GVWR; 001+ svar. GVWR; 001–10; 001–14; 001–16; 001–19; 001–33; 500 svar. GVWR; 501–26; 1 klasė: 0–6; 2 klasė: 6; 3 klasė: 10; 4 klasė: 14; 5 klasė: 16; 6 klasė: 19; 7 klasė: 26; 8 klasė: 33; Kita